data/hungarian.aff
SFX ó Y 300
SFX ó   ök   özöttség     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcTtX
SFX ó   ök   özött        ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÝÔŘBVLjcHRtXN%
SFX ó   ök   özött        ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   öző          ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   özés         ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   öztető       ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   öztetés      ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   öztetett     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcGRtX%
SFX ó   ök   öztetett     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   öztetendő    ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX%
SFX ó   ök   öztet        ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} EeX%
SFX ó   ök   özik         ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} PpX%
SFX ó   ök   özhetőség    ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcTtX
SFX ó   ök   özhető       ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   özhetett     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   özhetetlenség ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcTtX
SFX ó   ök   özhetetlen   ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAtAtlAn_UNABLE_adj]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcGRtX.%
SFX ó   ök   özhet        ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   özgető       ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   özgetés      ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   özgethetőség ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcTtX
SFX ó   ök   özgethető    ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   özgethetett  ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   özgethet     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   özgetett     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcGRX%t
SFX ó   ök   özgetett     ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   özget        ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   özetlenség   ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcRX
SFX ó   ök   özetlen      ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAlAn_LESS_adj]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcGRtX%
SFX ó   ök   özendő       ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[AndÓ_FUTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ŢÔŘCWMjcHRX%
SFX ó   ök   öz           ök                        [z_ACTION_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} EeX%
SFX ó   ök   ösödöttség   ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]}+[sÁg_ABSTRACT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcTtX
SFX ó   ök   ösödött      ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tt_PASTPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ÝÔŘBVLjcHRtXN%
SFX ó   ök   ösödött      ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   ösödő        ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   ösödés       ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   ösödik       ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Pp%X
SFX ó   ök   ösödhetett   ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   ösödhet      ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   ösödgethetett ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   ösödgethet   ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   ösödgetett   ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[PAST_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3] X
SFX ó   ök   ösödget      ök                        [s_ATTRIBUTE_adj]{+[NOM]}+[Odik_MEDIAL_vrb_it]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[gAt_FREQ_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
SFX ó   ök   ösítő        ök                        [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   ösítés       ök                        [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   ösíttető     ök                        [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ó_PRESPART_adj]{+[NOM]} ĐÓ×BVLjcGRX
SFX ó   ök   ösíttetés    ök                        [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[Ás_PROCESS/RESULT_noun]{+[NOM]} nÓ×BVLjcXTt
SFX ó   ök   ösíttethet   ök                        [sít_SUPPLY_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[tAt_FACTITIVE_vrb_tr]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]}+[hAt_MODAL_vrb]{+[PRES_INDIC_INDEF_SG_3]} Ee%X
