data/hungarian.dic
ügyfelek/IóÍžĆćşx	ügyfél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
összbirodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	összbirodalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ökrösszekerek/wIóÍžĆćşx	ökrösszekér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ólak/IóÍžĆćşx	ól[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
érétkek/wIóÍžJĆćş´x
érmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	érem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
átmenőforgalmak/wIóÍžJĆćş´x	átmenőforgalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
árkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	árok[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
állszakállak/IóÍžĆćşx	állszakáll[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
Ásotthalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	Ásotthalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
zsúpfödelek/IóÍžĆćşx	zsúpfödél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vízárak/IóÍžĆćşx	vízár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vízcsövek/IóÍžĆćşx	vízcső[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
védőszárnyak/IóÍžĆćşx	védőszárny[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vándordíjak/IóÍžĆćşx	vándordíj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vonóhorgok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	vonóhorog[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
visszerek/IóÍžĆćşx	visszér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vidrakeserűfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	vidrakeserűfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
versenytársak/IóÍžĆćşx	versenytárs[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vasgyárak/IóÍžĆćşx	vasgyár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
uzsoraárak/IóÍžĆćşx	uzsoraár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
türelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	türelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tökbelek/IóÍžĆćşx	tökbél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tányérkerekek/IóÍžĆćşx	tányérkerék[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tonnatartalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	tonnatartalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tetőcserepek/IóÍžĆćşx	tetőcserép[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tengericsövek/IóÍžĆćşx	tengericső[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tantárgyak/IóÍžĆćşx	tantárgy[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szótövek/IóÍžĆćşx	szótő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szárnytollak/IóÍžĆćşx	szárnytoll[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szirmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	szirom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szemhéjak/IóÍžĆćşx	szemhéj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szabóizmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	szabóizom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
seprűnyelek/IóÍžĆćşx	seprűnyél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
rétegvizek/IóÍžĆćşx	rétegvíz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
remekművek/IóÍžĆćşx	remekmű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
páncéltornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	páncéltorony[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
pipaszutykok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	pipaszutyok[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
országutak/IóÍžĆćşx	országút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyúltagyak/IóÍžĆćşx	nyúltagy[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyakak/IóÍžĆćşx	nyak[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
műtermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	műterem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
murvalevelek/IóÍžĆćşx	murvalevél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
mentsvárak/IóÍžĆćşx	mentsvár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
magánkórházak/IóÍžĆćşx	magánkórház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
légterek/IóÍžĆćşx	légtér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
leveseskanalak/IóÍžĆćşx	leveseskanál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kültelkek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kültelek[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
könyökcsövek/IóÍžĆćşx	könyökcső[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
készpénzárak/IóÍžĆćşx	készpénzár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kulcslyukak/IóÍžĆćşx	kulcslyuk[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kiutak/IóÍžĆćşx	kiút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kifolyócsövek/IóÍžĆćşx	kifolyócső[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kegyelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kegyelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kandiscukrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kandiscukor[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
jegenyenyárak/IóÍžĆćşx	jegenyenyár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
igásbarmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	igásbarom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hátszelek/IóÍžĆćşx	hátszél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hintalovak/IóÍžĆćşx	hintaló[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
harántizmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	harántizom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hajak/IóÍžĆćşx	haj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
gálickövek/IóÍžĆćşx	gálickő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
gyomortartalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	gyomortartalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fülesbaglyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	fülesbagoly[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fénymázak/IóÍžĆćşx	fénymáz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fonalak/IóÍžĆćşx	fonál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
felvonóhidak/IóÍžĆćşx	felvonóhíd[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
farkasfogak/IóÍžĆćşx	farkasfog[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
előszelek/IóÍžĆćşx	előszél[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
díszfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	díszfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
derekak/IóÍžĆćşx	derék[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
csizmaszárak/IóÍžĆćşx	csizmaszár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
cipészhurkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	cipészhurok[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
bérházak/IóÍžĆćşx	bérház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
boltkövek/IóÍžĆćşx	boltkő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
bekötővasútvonalak/wIóÍžĆćşx	bekötővasútvonal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
autóutak/IóÍžĆćşx	autóút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
alapvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx	alapvonal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
Szabadságszobrok/wIóÍžJĆćş´x	Szabadságszobor[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
